Utah statutes.
63G-4-302.   Agency review -- Reconsideration.

(1) (a)  Within 20 days after the date that an order is issued for which review by the agency or by a superior agency under Section 63G-4-301 is unavailable, and if the order would otherwise constitute final agency action, any party may file a written request for reconsideration with the agency, stating the specific grounds upon which relief is requested.

(b)  Unless otherwise provided by statute, the filing of the request is not a prerequisite for seeking judicial review of the order.

(2)  The request for reconsideration shall be filed with the agency and one copy shall be mailed to each party by the person making the request.

(3) (a)  The agency head, or a person designated for that purpose, shall issue a written order granting the request or denying the request.

(b)  If the agency head or the person designated for that purpose does not issue an order within 20 days after the filing of the request, the request for reconsideration shall be considered to be denied.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

